Hawaii statutes.
§206M-15.5 High technology special fund.
There is established in the state treasury a fund to be known as the high
technology special fund, into which shall be deposited, except as otherwise
provided by section 206M-17, all moneys, fees, and equity from tenants,
qualified persons, or other users of the development corporation's industrial
parks, projects, other leased facilities, and other services and publications;
provided that the total amount of moneys in the fund shall not exceed
$3,000,000 at the end of any fiscal year. All moneys in the fund are
appropriated for the purposes of and shall be expended by the development
corporation for the operation, maintenance, and management of its industrial
parks, projects, facilities, services, and publications, and to pay the
expenses in administering the special purpose revenue bonds of the development
corporation or in carrying out its project agreements. [L 1989, c 274, pt of
§1; am L 2000, c 72, §20 and c 297, §28]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next